Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 16

Cooperative Marketing Associations

43-16-101. Short title.

For the purpose of brevity and convenience, this chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Cooperative Marketing Law.”

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 2534a27; Code 1932, § 3785; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1801.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, chapter 29.

Buyers' clubs, title 47, ch. 18, part 5.

Coal cooperative marketing associations, title 59, ch. 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Associations and Clubs, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Equity — Enjoining Stranger from Breach of Cooperative Marketing Contract, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 160.

Comparative Legislation. Cooperative marketing associations:

Ala. Code § 2-10-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-2-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-10-80 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 272.1001 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 79-19-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 274.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 54-129 et seq.

Cited: Tennessee Burley Tobacco Growers' Ass'n v. Commodity Credit Corp., 350 F.2d 34, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 4547 (6th Cir. 1965).

43-16-102. Purpose of chapter.

This chapter is enacted in order to promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of agricultural products and other products of the soil, through cooperation; to eliminate speculation and waste; to make the distribution of agricultural products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done; to stabilize the marketing of agricultural products; and to provide for the organization and incorporation of cooperative marketing associations for the marketing of such products.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2534a26; Code 1932, § 3784; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1802.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Associations and Clubs, § 5.

Cited: State ex rel. Attorney-General v. Burley Tobacco Growers' Co-operative Asso., 2 Tenn. App. 674, — S.W. —, 1926 Tenn. App. LEXIS 65 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1926).

43-16-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural products” includes horticultural, viticultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee and any farm products;

“Association” means any corporation organized under this chapter;

“Member” includes actual members of associations without capital stock, and holders of common stock in associations organized with capital stock; and

“Person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, and association.

An association organized under this chapter shall be deemed “nonprofit,” inasmuch as it is not organized to make profit for itself, as such, or for its members, as such, but only for its members as producers.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 2534a27; Code 1932, § 3785; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1803.

43-16-104. Nonprofit cooperative association — Persons entitled to form.

Eleven (11) or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this state, engaged in the production of agricultural products, may form a nonprofit, cooperative association, with or without capital stock, under this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 2534a28; Code 1932, § 3786; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1804.

Collateral References.

Liability of member of unincorporated association for tortious acts of association's nonmember agent or employee. 62 A.L.R.3d 1165.

43-16-105. Activities in which authorized to engage.

An association may be organized to engage in any activity:

In connection with the marketing or selling of the agricultural products of its members, or with the harvesting, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, shipping or utilization of such products, or the manufacturing or marketing of the by-products of such products;

In connection with the manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members of machinery, equipment, or supplies;

In the financing of the above enumerated activities; or

In any one (1) or more of the activities specified in this section.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 2534a29; Code 1932, § 3787; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1805.

43-16-106. Preliminary inquiry as to probable success.

Every group of persons contemplating the organization of an association under this chapter is urged to communicate with the college of agricultural sciences and natural resources, University of Tennessee, which will inform the group whatever the survey of the marketing conditions affecting the commodities proposed to be handled may indicate regarding probable success.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 2534a30; Code 1932, § 3788; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1806.

43-16-107. Recognition that farmers need special instruction data in marketing their products.

It is recognized that:

Agriculture is characterized by individual production in contrast to the group or factory system that characterizes other forms of industrial production;

The ordinary form of corporate organization permits industrial groups to combine for the purpose of group production and the ensuing group marketing and that the public has an interest in permitting farmers to bring their industry to the high degree of efficiency and merchandising skill evidenced in the manufacturing industries;

The public interest urgently needs to prevent the migration from the farm to the city in order to keep up farm production and to preserve the agricultural supply of the nation; and

The public interest demands that the farmer be encouraged to attain a superior and more direct system of marketing in the substitution of merchandising for the blind, unscientific, and speculative selling of crops; and

That for this purpose, the farmers should secure special guidance and instructive data from the college of agricultural sciences and natural resources, University of Tennessee.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 2534a31; Code 1932, § 3789; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1807.

43-16-108. Powers of incorporated association.

Each association incorporated under this chapter has the power to:

Engage in activity in connection with the marketing, selling, preserving, harvesting, drying, processing, manufacturing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, or utilization of any agricultural products produced or delivered to it by its members, or the manufacturing, or marketing of the by-products thereof; or any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment; or in the financing of any such activities; or in any one (1) or more of the activities specified in this section; and the association may also buy, sell and deal in agricultural products of nonmembers to an amount not greater in value than such as are handled by it for its members;

Borrow money and make advance payments and advances to members;

Act as the agent or representative of any member or members in any of the above mentioned activities;

Purchase or otherwise acquire, and hold, own, and exercise all rights or ownership in, and sell, transfer, or pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on or the retirement or redemption of shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association engaged in any related activity or in the warehousing or handling or marketing of any of the products handled by the association;

Establish reserves and invest the funds thereof in bonds or in such other property as may be provided in the bylaws;

Buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of any business of the association, or incidental thereto;

Establish, secure, own and develop patents, trademarks and copyrights; and

Do each and everything necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of any one (1) of the purposes or the attainment of any one (1) or more of the subjects, enumerated in this section, or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association, and contract accordingly; and, in addition, exercise and possess all powers, rights and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and, in addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this state to ordinary corporations, except those inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter, and to do any such thing anywhere.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 2534a32; Code 1932, § 3790; Acts 1933, ch. 93, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3790; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) § 43-1808.

43-16-109. Members — Qualifications.

Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the bylaws adopted by it, an association may admit as members, or issue common stock to, only persons engaged in the production of the agricultural products to be handled by or through the association, including the lessees and tenants of land used for the production of such products and any lessors and landlords who receive as rent all or any part of the crop raised on the leased premises.

If a member of a nonstock association is other than a natural person, that member may be represented by any individual, associate, officer, or manager, or member thereof, duly authorized in writing.

One (1) association organized under this chapter may become a member or stockholder of any other association or associations organized under this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 2534a33; Code 1932, § 3791; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1809.

43-16-110. Articles of incorporation — Preparing and filing — Contents.

Each association formed under this chapter must prepare and file articles of incorporation, setting forth:

The name of the association;

The purpose for which it is formed;

The place where its principal business will be transacted;

The duration of the association, if other than perpetual. If the charter of any association organized under this chapter provides for a term of existence, not exceeding fifty (50) years, such charter is deemed to be amended to provide that the duration of the association is perpetual, unless a majority of the members of such association vote to limit the duration of the association to some other period of time in accordance with title 48, chapter 3; provided, that in no event may the members so amend the charter of an association that has been in existence for more than fifty (50) years;

The number of directors of the association, which must be not less than five (5) and may be any number in excess of five (5); the term of office of such directors; and the names and addresses of those who are to serve as incorporating directors for the first term, and/or until the election and qualification of their successors;

If organized without capital stock, whether the property rights and interest of each member shall be equal or unequal; and if unequal, the general rule or rules applicable to all members by which the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member may and shall be determined and fixed; and provision for the admission of new members who shall be entitled to share in the property of the association with the old members, in accordance with such general rule or rules;

If organized with capital stock, the amount of stock and the number of shares into which it is divided and the par value thereof; and

The street address and zip code of the association's initial registered office in this state, the county in which the office is located, and the name of its initial registered agent at that office.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 2534a34; Code 1932, § 3792; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1810; Acts 1981, ch. 27, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 2015, ch. 323, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment in (6) deleted the last sentence which read, “This provision or paragraph of the articles of incorporation shall not be altered, amended or repealed, except by the written consent or vote of three fourths (¾) of the members;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 323, § 3. April 28, 2015.

Collateral References.

Articles of association. 33 A.L.R. 252, 47 A.L.R. 936, 77 A.L.R. 405, 98 A.L.R. 1406, 12 A.L.R.2d 130.

43-16-111. Capital stock — Articles specifying division into preferred and common stock.

The capital stock may be divided into preferred and common stock. If so divided, the articles of incorporation must contain a statement of the number of shares of stock to which preference is granted and the number of shares of stock to which no preference is granted, and the nature and definite extent of the preference and privileges granted to each.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 2534a35; Code 1932, § 3793; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1811.

43-16-112. Articles to be signed, acknowledged, and filed — Prima facie evidence of incorporation.

The articles must be signed by the incorporators; and when filed, the articles of incorporation, or certified copies thereof, shall be received in all the courts of this state and other places as prima facie evidence of the due incorporation of the association.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 2534a36; mod. Code 1932, § 3794; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1812; Acts 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Nonprofit Corporations — Definition, 17 Vand. L. Rev. 336.

43-16-113. Amendment of articles of incorporation.

An amendment, including any conversion to a general nonprofit corporation pursuant to § 48-61-109, must first be approved by two thirds (2/3) of the directors and then adopted by a vote representing a majority of all the members of the association.

However, if, at a meeting of the members of the association to which a proposed amendment has been submitted, a majority of the members are not present, then those present and also members voting by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a time and place certain, but not sooner than three (3) weeks from the time of adjournment. Prior to the convening of the adjourned meeting, notices shall be placed in a newspaper of general circulation in the place where the principal office of the association is located each week for three (3) weeks. These notices shall state the time, place, and purpose of the adjourned meeting. When the meeting reconvenes, the members present in person or by proxy shall constitute the quorum, and may take action on the proposed amendment by a majority vote of those represented, even if fewer than a majority of the total membership of the association.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 2534a37; mod. Code 1932, § 3795; Acts 1976, ch. 753, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1813; Acts 2015, ch. 323, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “, including any conversion to a general nonprofit corporation pursuant to § 48-61-109,” following “An amendment” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 323, § 3. April 28, 2015.

43-16-114. Code of bylaws — Provisions.

Each association incorporated under this chapter must, within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management, a code of bylaws, not inconsistent with the powers granted by this chapter. A majority vote of the members or stockholders, or their written assent, is necessary to adopt such bylaws. Each association, under its bylaws, may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The number of stockholders or members constituting a quorum;

The right of members or stockholders to vote by proxy or by mail, or both; and the conditions, manner, form, and effects of such votes;

The number of directors constituting a quorum;

The qualifications, compensation and duties and terms of office of directors and officers; time of their election and the mode and manner of giving notice thereof;

Penalties for violations of the bylaws;

The amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of such fees; and the purposes for which they may be used;

The amount that each member or stockholder shall be required to pay annually or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services rendered by the association and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing contract between the association and its members or stockholders, which every member or stockholder may be required to sign; and

The number and qualification of members or stockholders of the association and the conditions precedent to membership or ownership of common stock; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw or the holders of common stock to transfer their stock; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members and of the shares of common stock; the conditions upon which and the time when membership of any member shall cease; the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when the member ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; and the mode, manner and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member's interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member or stockholder, or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of the member's membership, or, at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors. In case of the withdrawal or expulsion of a member, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise the member's property interests in the association and shall fix the amount thereof in money, which shall be paid to the member within one (1) year after such expulsion or withdrawal.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 2534a38; mod. Code 1932, § 3796; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1814.

43-16-115. Regular and special meetings — Notice — Provisions as to notice.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one (1) or more regular meetings annually. The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time; and ten percent (10%) of the members or stockholders may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time. A meeting must thereupon be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting; provided, that the bylaws may require instead that notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published at the principal place of business of the association.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 2534a39; Code 1932, § 3797; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1815.

43-16-116. Management by directors — District directors — Bylaw provisions as to selection and qualifications.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors, elected by the members or stockholders from their own number.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to these districts, either directly or by district delegates elected by the members in that district. In such a case, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association. The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held in each district to elect the directors apportioned to the districts, and that the result of all such primary elections may be ratified by the next regular meeting of the association or may be considered final as to the association.

The bylaws may provide that one (1) or more directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members or their delegates. Such directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The directors so appointed need not be members or stockholders of the association, but shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one fifth (1/5) of the entire number of directors.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2534a40; Code 1932, § 3798; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1816.

43-16-117. Remuneration of officers, directors, and committeemen.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2534a41; Code 1932, § 3799; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1817.

43-16-118. Directors not to be interested in contracts for profit — Directors occupying positions in association.

No director, during that director's term of office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the association differing in any way from the business relations accorded regular members or holders of common stock of the association or others, or differing from terms generally current in that district. The bylaws may provide that no director shall occupy any position in the association, except the president and secretary, on regular salary or substantially full-time pay.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2534a42; Code 1932, § 3800; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1818.

43-16-119. Executive committee and its functions.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2534a43; Code 1932, § 3801; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1819.

43-16-120. Vacancies in board of directors — Filling.

When a vacancy on the board of directors occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy, unless the bylaws provide for an election of directors by district stockholders. In that case, the board of directors shall immediately call a special meeting of the members or stockholders in that district to fill the vacancy.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2534a44; Code 1932, § 3802; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1820.

43-16-121. Officers elected by directors — Treasurer.

The directors shall elect from their number a president and one (1) or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be directors or members of the association; and they may combine the two (2) latter offices and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer; or unite both functions and titles in one (1) person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such, shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In that case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, excepting that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 2534a45; Code 1932, § 3803; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1821.

43-16-122. Bonds — Of whom required.

Every officer, employee, and agent handling funds or negotiable instruments or property of or for any association created under this chapter shall be required to execute and deliver adequate bond for the faithful performance of that person's duties and obligations.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 14; Shan. Supp., § 2534a46; Code 1932, § 3804; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1822.

43-16-123. Certificate of membership.

A member of an association established without capital stock who has paid the membership fee in full shall receive a certificate of membership.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a47; Code 1932, § 3805; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1822.

43-16-124. Stock — Issuance upon payment — Voting right unaffected where held as security.

No association shall issue stock to a member until it has been fully paid for. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note; but such retention as security shall not affect the member's right to vote.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a48; Code 1932, § 3806; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1824.

43-16-125. Liability of members for debts.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on the member's membership fee or the member's subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory notes given in payment of that amount.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a49; Code 1932, § 3807; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1825.

Collateral References.

Debts, liability of members for. 25 A.L.R. 1113, 33 A.L.R. 247, 47 A.L.R. 936, 77 A.L.R. 405, 98 A.L.R. 1406, 12 A.L.R.2d 130.

Validity and construction of provision for liquidated damages in contract with cooperative marketing association. 25 A.L.R. 1113, 33 A.L.R. 247, 47 A.L.R. 936, 77 A.L.R. 405, 98 A.L.R. 1406, 12 A.L.R.2d 130.

43-16-126. Member or stockholder entitled to only one vote.

No member or stockholder shall be entitled to more than one (1) vote, regardless of the number of shares of common stock owned by that person.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a51; Code 1932, § 3809; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1827.

43-16-127. Preferred stock — Redemption or retirement.

Any association organized with stock under this chapter may issue preferred stock, with or without the right to vote. Preferred stock may be sold to any person, member or nonmember, and may be redeemable or retireable by the association on such terms and conditions as may be provided for by the articles of incorporation and printed on the face of the certificate.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a52; Code 1932, § 3810; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1828.

43-16-128. Common stock not to be transferred to persons not engaged in agricultural production.

The bylaws shall prohibit the transfer of the common stock of the association to persons not engaged in the production of agricultural products handled by the association; and such restrictions must be printed upon every certificate of stock subject to the restrictions.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a53; Code 1932, § 3811; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1829.

43-16-129. Purchase of its common stock by association.

The association may, at any time, as specified in the bylaws, except when the debts of the association exceed fifty percent (50%) of the assets of the association, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value of the common stock, as conclusively determined by the board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one (1) year after the purchase.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2534a54; Code 1932, § 3812; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1830.

43-16-130. Removal of officers or directors.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by five percent (5%) of the members, requesting the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director, and fill the vacancy. The officer or director against whom the charges have been brought shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses; and the person or persons bringing the charges against the officer or director shall have the same opportunity.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 2534a55; Code 1932, § 3813; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1831.

43-16-131. Procedure for removal of directors elected in a district.

In case the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, then the petition for removal of a director must be signed by twenty percent (20%) of the members residing in the district from which the director was elected. The board of directors must call a special meeting of the members residing in that district to consider the removal of the directors; and by a vote of the majority of the members of that district, the director in question shall be removed from office.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 2534a56; Code 1932, § 3814; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1832.

43-16-132. Referendum of policy matters upon demand to entire membership.

Upon demand of one third (1/3) of the entire board of directors, made immediately and so recorded at the same meeting at which the original motion was passed, any matter of policy that has been approved or passed by the board must be referred to the entire membership or the stockholders for decision at the next special or regular meeting; and a special meeting may be called for the purpose.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 2534a57; Code 1932, § 3815; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1833.

43-16-133. Marketing contracts with association.

The association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts, requiring the members to sell, for any period of time, not over ten (10) years, all or any specified part of their agricultural products or specified commodities exclusively to or through the association, or any facilities to be created by the association. If they contract a sale to the association, it shall be conclusively held that title to the products passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded and statutory liens, to the association upon delivery. The contract may provide, among other things, that the association may sell or resell the products delivered by its members, with or without taking title thereto, and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest or dividends on stock, not exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum, and reserves for retiring the stock, if any; and other proper reserves; and/or any other deductions.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 18; Shan. Supp., § 2534a58; Code 1932, § 3816; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1834.

Cited: State ex rel. Attorney-General v. Burley Tobacco Growers' Co-operative Asso., 2 Tenn. App. 674, — S.W. —, 1926 Tenn. App. LEXIS 65 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1926).

43-16-134. Provisions of marketing contracts — Liquidated damages — Injunction against breach.

The bylaws or the marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member or stockholder to the association upon the breach by the member or stockholder of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products, and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees, in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association. Any such provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. Such clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

In the event of any such breach or threatened breach of the marketing contract by a member, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance thereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 2534a59; Code 1932, § 3817; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1835.

Law Reviews.

Equity — Enjoining Stranger from Breach of Cooperative Marketing Contract, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 160.

43-16-135. Purchase of property with preferred stock.

Whenever an association, organized under this chapter with preferred capital stock, purchases the stock or any property, or any interest in any property of any person, it may discharge the obligations so incurred, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest, shares of its preferred capital stock to an amount that at par value would equal the fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case, the transfer to the association of the stock or interest purchased shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock issued.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 20; Shan. Supp., § 2534a60; Code 1932, § 3818; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1836.

43-16-136. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-16-136 (Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 21; Shan. Supp., § 2534a61; Code 1932, § 3819; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1837), concerning annual reports of associations, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 243, § 3.

43-16-137. Conflicting laws do not apply.

Any law that is in conflict with this chapter shall be construed as not applying to the associations provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 22; Shan. Supp., § 2534a62; Code 1932, § 3820; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1838.

43-16-138. Exemptions of agricultural products apply, though in possession of association.

Any exemptions whatsoever under all existing laws applying to agricultural products in the possession or under the control of the individual producer shall apply similarly and completely to such products delivered by its former members in the possession or under the control of the association.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 22; Shan. Supp., § 2534a63; Code 1932, § 3821; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1839.

43-16-139. Association may be interested in other like associations.

An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other corporation or corporations, with or without capital stock, and engaged in preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, storing, handling, shipping, utilizing, manufacturing, marketing, or selling of the agricultural products handled by the association or the by-products of such products.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 2534a64; Code 1932, § 3822; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1840.

43-16-140. Warehousing corporations issuing warehouse receipts to association or its members — Discrimination prohibited.

If those corporations are warehousing corporations, they may issue legal warehouse receipts to the association against the commodities delivered by it or to any other person, and the legal warehouse receipts shall be considered as adequate collateral to the extent of the usual and current value of the commodity represented by the receipts. In case the warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded under the laws of this or any other state or the United States, its warehouse receipt delivered to the association on commodities of the association or its members, or delivered by the association or its members, shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the association.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 2534a65; Code 1932, § 3823; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1841.

43-16-141. Association may contract with other cooperative associations.

Any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements, and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, and contracts and arrangements with any other cooperative corporation, association, or associations, formed in this or in any other state, for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part or parts of its business.

Any two (2) or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using or may separately employ and use the same personnel, methods, means and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective businesses.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 24; Shan. Supp., § 2534a66; Code 1932, § 3824; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1842.

43-16-142. Associations of other states upon compliance with laws as to foreign corporations doing business in this state.

Any corporation or association organized under generally similar laws of another state shall be allowed to carry on any proper activities, operations or functions in this state upon compliance with the general regulations applicable to foreign corporations desiring to do business in this state, and the payment into the office of the secretary of state the same fees that are required to be paid under title 48, chapter 1, part 13 [repealed], and by paying all other taxes that other foreign corporations are required to pay in Tennessee, and all contracts that could be made by any association, incorporated under this chapter, made by or with such association, shall be legal and valid and enforceable in this state with all of the remedies set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 25; Shan. Supp., § 2534a67; Code 1932, § 3825; Acts 1941, ch. 33, § 1; 1949, ch. 158, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3825; impl. am. Acts 1968, ch. 523; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1843.

Compiler's Notes. Title 48, chapter 1, part 13, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.05 and Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.05. For new, similar provisions as to business corporations, see title 48, ch. 25. As to nonprofit corporations, see title 48, ch. 55.

Law Reviews.

The Tobacco Growers Association Case (Abe D. Waldauer), 5 Tenn. L. Rev. 123.

43-16-143. Marketing contracts do not constitute conspiracy, combination, illegal monopoly, or unlawful restraint of trade.

No association organized under this chapter and complying with the terms of this chapter shall be deemed to be a conspiracy or a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily; nor shall the marketing contracts and agreements between the association and its members or any agreements authorized in this chapter be considered illegal as such or in unlawful restraint of trade or as part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 27; Shan. Supp., § 2534a69; Code 1932, § 3826; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1844.

43-16-144. General corporation laws applicable — Exception.

The general corporation laws and all powers and rights under those laws apply to the associations organized under this chapter, except where such provisions are in conflict or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 29; Shan. Supp., § 2534a71; Code 1932, § 3827; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1845.

Cross-References. Corporations generally, title 48.

43-16-145. Annual fee in lieu of other taxes — Exception.

Each association organized under this chapter shall pay an annual fee of ten dollars ($10.00) only, in lieu of all franchise, license, corporation or other privilege taxes, or taxes or charges upon reserves held by it for members; provided, that if any association organized under this chapter sells to persons other than its own members any product or merchandise other than unmanufactured tobacco, livestock, poultry products, dairy products or any other farm products, such association shall be liable for any privilege tax with respect to such transactions or method of doing business imposed under the laws of Tennessee, other than franchise and excise taxes and corporation filing fees or charges upon reserves held by it for members.

Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 30; Shan. Supp., § 2534a72; Code 1932, § 3828; Acts 1947, ch. 172, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3828; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1846.